Maryland, session 2025, SB0654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission shall retain and consult
with an independent third–party auditor to conduct an audit of the Commission’s raw water
pipeline project, Contract No. BF1582E91, that extends from the Rocky Gorge Pumping
Station on Brooklyn Bridge Road to the Patuxent Water Filtration Plant on Sandy Spring
Road.
(b) In conducting the audit, the third–party auditor shall be required to consult
with the Office of Legislative Audits.
(c) The audit shall provide:
(1) a detailed timeline of the project;
(2) the reasons why the project has been delayed past its completion date
of March 2023;
(3) a detailed accounting of the costs associated with the project; and
(4) any other items recommended by the Office of Legislative Audits.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0654*

SENATE BILL 654
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That on or before October 1, 2026,
the Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission shall report the findings of the audit to
the Senate Education, Energy, and the Environment Committee and the House Economic
Matters Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of September
30, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.